Nebraska, session 109, LB901A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB901A LB901A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the
Behavioral Health Services Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $1 from the
Behavioral Health Services Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health
and Human Services, for Program 38, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 901, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session,
2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$-0- Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-